csv2fst/yaml_output/VII_IND_ii.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: gonzaabii
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: gonzaabiiwan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: gonzaabiini
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: gonzaabiiniwan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: gonzaabiisinoon
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: gonzaabiisinoon
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: gonzaabiisinini
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: gonzaabiisininiwan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx: gonzaabiiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx: [gonzaabiibaniin,gonzaabiibanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv: gonzaabiiniiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv: [gonzaabiiniibaniin,gonzaabiiniibanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx: gonzaabiisinooban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx: [ginzaabiisinoobaniin,ginzaabiisinoobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv: gonzaabiisininiiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv: [gonzaabiisininiibaniin,gonzaabiisininiibanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx: gonzaabiidog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx: gonzaabiidogenan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv: gonzaabiiniwidog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv: gonzaabiiniwidogenan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx: gonzaabiisinodog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx: gonzaabiisinodogenan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv: gonzaabiisininiwidog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv: gonzaabiisininiwidogenan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: gonzaabiigoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [gonzaabiigobaniin,gonzaabiigobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: gonzaabiinigoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [gonzaabiinigobaniin,gonzaabiinigobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: gonzaabiisinoogoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [gonzaabiisinoogobaniin,gonzaabiisinoogobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: gonzaabiisininigoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [gonzaabiisininigobaniin,gonzaabiisininigobanen]
